Ohio, session 136, HB436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.968 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5534.968. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 7
the Revised Code or otherwise, the northbound and southbound 8
lanes of interstate route number seventy-seven between Cambridge 9
road and the southernmost intersection of that route and 10
highland ridge road, in Washington county, shall be known as the 11
"Auxiliary Patrolman Earl Ulmer Memorial Highway." 12
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 13
along the highway indicating its name. 14